Arkansas, session 2025, HB1791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 1, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
1-1-104. Certain international organizations — Jurisdiction and
enforcement or implementation authority.
(a) The World Health Organization and the United Nations do not have
jurisdiction or power within this state.
(b) A requirement or mandate issued by the World Health Organization
or the United Nations shall not be:
(1) Enforced or implemented by this state or a political
subdivision of this state, including without limitation a state agency,
county, city, town, precinct, water district, school district, school
*JMB106*
03/13/2025 2:12:55 PM JMB106

HB1791
administrative unit, or quasi-public entity;
(2) Used in this state as a basis for action or to direct,
order, or impose any requirements of any kind, including requirements for
masks, vaccinations, or medical testing, that are contrary to the Arkansas
Constitution and state laws; or
(3) Used in this state to gather any public or private
information about the citizens or residents of this state.





























03/13/2025 2:12:55 PM JMB106